Utah statutes.
17D-1-107.   Contracts subject to building improvement and public works
provisions.
(1)  For each special service district created by a county, the legislative
body of that county shall by ordinance designate the classes of special
service district contracts that are subject to the requirements of Title 11,
Chapter 39, Building Improvements and Public Works Projects.
(2)  For each special service district created by a municipality, the
legislative body of that municipality shall by ordinance designate the classes
of special service district contracts that are subject to the requirements of
Title 11, Chapter 39, Building Improvements and Public Works Projects.
